New Mexico, session 2026, HB159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.-- A. One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 to: (1) establish a pilot program that enables kindergarten through twelfth grade students and their families to access a no-cost, comprehensive and evidence-based mental health support platform that offers mental health education, self-management resources and care navigation supports; (2) contract for services to implement the pilot program described in Paragraph (1) of this subsection; and (3) develop and submit a report that analyzes the impact of the pilot program described in Paragraph (1) of this subsection to the legislative education study committee. B. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -